Washington statutes.
RCW 18.138.020

Certification required.

(1) No persons shall represent themselves as certified dietitians or certified nutritionists unless certified as provided for in this chapter.

(2) Persons represent themselves as certified dietitians or certified nutritionists when any title or any description of services is used which incorporates one or more of the following items or designations: "Certified dietitian," "certified dietician," "certified nutritionist," "D.," "C.D.," or "C.N."

(3) The secretary may by rule proscribe or regulate advertising and other forms of patient solicitation which are likely to mislead or deceive the public as to whether someone is certified under this chapter.

[ 1991 c 3 s 279; 1988 c 277 s 2.]